ro-RO: Mobilier > Mobilier pentru bebeluși și copii mici > Accesorii pentru leagăn/pătuț pentru copii: Elemente de protecție și inserții pentru pătuț; Seturi de conversie pătuț; Protecții și huse de saltea pentru pătuț; Lenjerie de pat pentru pătuț
en: Furniture > Baby & Toddler Furniture > Crib & Toddler Bed Accessories: Crib Bumpers & Liners; Crib Conversion Kits; Crib Mattress Protectors & Pads; Crib Sheets & Bedding
pl: Meble > Meble dla dzieci i niemowląt > Akcesoria do łóżeczek i łóżek dziecinnych: Osłonki do łóżeczek dziecinnych; Barierki do łóżeczek dziecinnych; Ochraniacze i podkłady na materace do łóżeczek; Prześcieradła i pościel do łóżeczka
pt-BR: Móveis > Móveis para bebês > Acessórios para berço e cama infantil: Protetores de berço; Kits para conversão de berço; Protetores e capas de colchão para berço; Lençóis e roupas de cama para berço
lt-LT: Baldai > Baldai kūdikiams ir mažiems vaikams > Supamųjų lovyčių ir lovyčių mažiems vaikams priedai: Supamųjų lovyčių paminkštinimai ir įklotai; Supamųjų lovyčių konvertavimo rinkiniai; Lovelių čiužinių apsaugos ir paklotai; Lovelių paklodės ir patalynė
hu: Bútor > Baba- és csecsemőbútorok > Kiságy- és csecsemőágy-kiegészítők: Kiságylökhárítók és betétek; Kiságyátalakító készletek; Kiságy matracvédők és alátétek; Kiságy lepedők és ágyneműk
sv: Möbler > Möbler för bebisar och småbarn > Tillbehör till spjälsängar och barnsängar: Kuddar och insatser till spjälsängar; Konverteringskit för spjälsängar; Madrasskydd & bäddmadrasser för spjälsängar; Lakan & sängkläder för spjälsängar
hr-HR: Namještaj > Namještaj za bebe i malu djecu > Dodaci za dječje krevete i krevetiće: Ogradice i umetci za krevetić; Kompleti za preobrazbu krevetića; Zaštite i podloge za madrace za krevetić; Posteljina i plahte za krevetić
zh-CN: 家具 > 婴幼儿家具 > 婴儿床/儿童床配件: 婴儿床保险杆/衬垫; 婴儿床延伸套件; 婴儿床垫保护套和垫子; 婴儿床单和床上用品
ko: 가구 > 영유아 가구 > 영유아용 침대 부대용품: 아기 침대 범퍼/깔개; 영유아용 침대 변환 키트; 유아용 침대 매트리스 프로텍터 및 패드; 유아용 침대 시트 및 침구
it: Arredamento > Mobili per bebè e bimbi > Accessori per lettini bambino: Paracolpi per lettino; Kit trasformazione lettino; Coprimaterassi e protezioni per culle; Lenzuola e biancheria da letto per culle
nb: Møbler > Møbler for baby og barn > Tilbehør for vugger og barnesenger: Sengekanter for vugger; Konverteringssett for vugger; Madrassbeskyttere og overmadrasser til sprinkelseng; Laken og sengetøy til sprinkelseng
da: Møbler > Møbler til baby og småbørn > Tremmesenge og børnesenge – tilbehør: Sengerande; Kravlesengesæt; Madrasbeskyttere og rullemadrasser til tremmesenge; Lagner og sengetøj til tremmesenge
cs: Nábytek > Nábytek pro děti a kojence > Dětské postýlky – příslušenství: Mantinely do dětských postýlek; Sady na přestavbu dětských postýlek; Chrániče a podložky na matraci do postýlky; Prostěradla a lůžkoviny do postýlky
nl: Meubelen > Meubelen voor baby's en peuters > Accessoires voor peuter- en kinderbedjes: Bedbumpers en -beveiliging; Ombouwsets voor peuterbedjes; Matrasbeschermers en oplegmatrassen voor ledikanten; Ledikantlakens en beddengoed
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Mobiliário de bebé e criança > Acessórios para berço e cama de bebé: Protetores e forros de berço; Kits de conversão de berço; Protetores e resguardos para colchão de cama de grades; Lençóis e roupa de cama de grades
vi: Đồ gỗ > Đồ nội thất cho trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ nhỏ > Phụ kiện giường cũi em bé: Ga đệm giường cũi em bé; Thanh chuyển đổi giường cũi; Tấm lót & tấm bảo vệ nệm cũi; Ga trải & bộ chăn ga gối cho cũi
fr: Meubles > Mobilier pour bébés et tout-petits > Accessoires pour lits de bébé et d’enfant: Bordures et tours de lits de bébé; Kits de conversion de lits de bébé; Protège-matelas et alèses pour lits à barreaux; Draps et literie pour lits à barreaux
el: Έπιπλα > Βρεφικά & παιδικά έπιπλα > Αξεσουάρ για κούνιες & παιδικά κρεβάτια: Προφυλακτήρες & επενδύσεις κούνιας; Κιτ μετατροπής κούνιας; Προστατευτικά στρώματος και καλύμματα για βρεφικές κούνιες; Σεντόνια και λευκά είδη για βρεφικές κούνιες
fi: Huonekalut > Vauvojen ja leikki-ikäisten huonekalut > Pinnasänkyjen ja lastensänkyjen lisätarvikkeet: Pinnasänkyn pehmusteet ja reunukset; Pinnasängyn muuntosetit; Pinnasänkyjen patjansuojat ja sijauspatjat; Pinnasänkyjen lakanat ja vuodevaatteet
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > เฟอร์นิเจอร์สำหรับทารกและเด็กเล็ก > อุปกรณ์เตียงเด็กเล็ก: ที่กันชนและที่บุรองสำหรับเตียงเด็กเล็ก; ชุดแปลงเตียงนอนเด็ก; แผ่นรองกันเปื้อนและแผ่นรองเตียงเด็ก; ผ้าปูและชุดเครื่องนอนเตียงเด็ก
es: Mobiliario > Mobiliario para bebés y niños pequeños > Accesorios para cunas y camas para niños: Acolchados y revestimientos para cunas; Kits de conversión para cunas; Protectores y fundas de colchón para cuna; Sábanas y ropa de cama para cuna
de: Möbel > Baby- & Kleinkindmöbel > Gitter- & Kinderbettzubehör: Bettnestchen & Randschutz für Gitterbetten; Umbausätze für Gitterbetten; Kinderbett-Matratzenschoner & -auflagen; Kinderbettlaken & -bettzeug
bg-BG: Мебели > Мебели за бебета и малки деца > Аксесоари за бебешки легла и креватчета за малки деца: Протектори и обиколници за бебешки легла; Комплекти за преустройство на бебешки легла; Протектори и подложки за матраци за детски креватчета; Чаршафи и спално бельо за детски креватчета
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Pohištvo za dojenčke in malčke > Dodatki za posteljice in otroške posteljice: Podloge in obloge za otroške posteljice; Kompleti za predelavo otroških posteljic; Zaščite in podloge za vzmetnice za otroške posteljice; Posteljnina in rjuhe za otroške posteljice
ja: 家具 > ベビー用家具 > ベビーベッド関連用品: ベビーベッド用ベッドガード; ベビーベッド組み換えキット; ベビーベッドマットレスプロテクター・パッド; ベビーベッドシーツ・寝具
tr: Mobilyalar > Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Mobilyaları > Bebek Karyolası ve Küçük Çocuk Yatağı Aksesuarları: Bebek Karyolası Yan Koruma Yastıkları ve Kenarlıkları; Bebek Karyolası Dönüştürme Setleri; Bebek karyolası yatak koruyucuları ve pedleri; Bebek karyolası çarşafları ve uyku setleri
ru: Мебель > Мебель для детей и младенцев > Аксессуары для кроватей для детей и младенцев: Бортики и накладки для детских кроватей; Комплекты для кроватей-трансформеров; Наматрасники и чехлы для кроваток; Простыни и постельное белье для кроваток
zh-TW: 家具 > 嬰幼兒家具 > 嬰幼兒床配件: 嬰兒床防撞床圍; 嬰兒床改裝工具組; 嬰兒床保潔墊與護墊; 嬰兒床單與寢具
sk-SK: Nábytok > Detský nábytok > Príslušenstvo do detských postieľok: Mantinely a podložky do detskej postieľky; Súpravy na konverziu postieľok; Chrániče a podložky na matrac do postieľky; Posteľná bielizeň a plachty do postieľok